Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF438.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin CRANE LAKE WATER AND SANITARY DISTRICT; BOARD OF MANAGERS.new text end new text begin (a) Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 442A.14, subdivision 1, upon approval by the related governing body, the board of managers of the Crane Lake Water and Sanitary District may be reduced from five members to three members, as provided in paragraphs (b) and (c). new text end new text begin (b) Upon approval pursuant to paragraph (a), and notwithstanding anything to the contrary in Minnesota Statutes, section 442A.14, vacancies on the board of managers shall not be filled until the number of current board members has been reduced to three. Once the board of managers has three members, vacancies on the board shall be filled as provided in Minnesota Statutes, section 442A.14, as necessary to maintain a three-member board of managers. new text end new text begin (c) Once the board of managers has three members as provided in paragraph (b), the related governing body shall assign newly elected board members to one of the groups under Minnesota Statutes, section 442A.14, subdivision 2, clauses (1) to (3), as necessary to ensure, to the extent practical, that no two board members have terms that expire in the same year. Thereafter, board members shall be elected successively for regular terms beginning upon expiration of the preceding terms and expiring on the first business day in January of the third calendar year thereafter. Each board member serves until a successor is elected and has qualified. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day after the governing body of the Crane Lake Water and Sanitary District and its chief clerical officer comply with the requirements of Minnesota Statutes, section 645.021, subdivisions 2 and 3. new text end